Utah statutes.
73-10-16.   State water plan -- Payment for special studies and investigations.

Special studies or investigations needed for development of a water plan which might be requested of other agencies, but not included in the budgets or the work programs of such agencies, may be paid for from funds hereby appropriated for the formulation of a state water plan.

